Utah statutes.
70A-4-211.   When bank gives value for purposes of holder in due course.

For purposes of determining its status as a holder in due course, a bank has given value to the extent that it has a security interest in an item if the bank otherwise complies with the requirements of Section 70A-3-302 on what constitutes a holder in due course.

